Washington statutes.
RCW 44.28.088

Performance audit reports—Preliminary, final.

(1) When the legislative auditor has completed a performance audit authorized in the performance audit work plan, the legislative auditor shall transmit the preliminary performance audit report to the affected state agency or local government and the office of financial management for comment. The agency or local government and the office of financial management shall provide any response to the legislative auditor within thirty days after receipt of the preliminary performance audit report unless a different time period is approved by the joint committee. The legislative auditor shall incorporate the response of the agency or local government and the office of financial management into the final performance audit report.

(2) Before releasing the results of a performance audit to the legislature or the public, the legislative auditor shall submit the preliminary performance audit report to the joint committee for its review, comments, and final recommendations. Any comments by the joint committee must be included as a separate addendum to the final performance audit report. Upon consideration and incorporation of the review, comments, and recommendations of the joint committee, the legislative auditor shall transmit the final performance audit report to the affected agency or local government, the director of financial management, the leadership of the senate and the house of representatives, and the appropriate standing committees of the house of representatives and the senate and shall publish the results and make the report available to the public. For purposes of this section, "leadership of the senate and the house of representatives" means the speaker of the house, the majority leaders of the senate and the house of representatives, the minority leaders of the senate and the house of representatives, the caucus chairs of both major political parties of the senate and the house of representatives, and the floor leaders of both major political parties of the senate and the house of representatives.

[ 2010 c 26 s 4; 2005 c 319 s 113; 2003 c 362 s 14; 1996 c 288 s 13.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—Part headings—Effective dates—2005 c 319: See notes following RCW 43.17.020.